ro-RO: Caracteristici frânare regenerativă: Nivel de regenerare reglabil; Activare automată; Integrarea sistemului de frânare; Ușor de instalat; Actualizări de software; Rezistență la intemperii; Altele
sl-SI: Funkcije regenerativnega zaviranja: Nastavljiva stopnja regeneracije; Samodejna aktivacija; Integracija zavornega sistema; Enostavno za namestitev; Posodobitve programske opreme; Odporno na vremenske vplive; Drugo
pt-PT: Recursos de frenagem regenerativa: Nível de regeneração ajustável; Ativação automática; Integração do sistema de travagem; Fácil de instalar; Atualizações de software; Resistente ao tempo; Outro
sk-SK: Funkcie rekuperačného brzdenia: Nastaviteľná úroveň regenerácie; Automatická aktivácia; Integrácia brzdového systému; Jednoduchá inštalácia; Aktualizácie softvéru; Odolný voči počasiu; Iné
lt-LT: Regeneracinių stabdžių savybės: Reguliuojamas regeneracijos lygis; Automatinis aktyvinimas; Stabdžių sistemos integravimas; Lengvai tvirtinami; Programinės įrangos atnaujinimai; Atsparūs oro sąlygoms; Kita
zh-TW: 再生煞車特點: 再生水平可調; 自動啟用; 煞車系統集成; 易於安裝; 軟體更新; 耐候; 其他
ko: 회생제동 기능: 조절식 재생 수준; 자동 활성화; 브레이크 시스템 통합; 쉬운 설치; 소프트웨어 업데이트; 내후성; 기타
pl: Charakterystyka hamowania regeneracyjnego: Regulowany poziom regeneracji; Automatyczna aktywacja; Integracja układu hamulcowego; Łatwa do instalacji; Aktualizacje oprogramowania; Odporny na warunki atmosferyczne; Inne
hr-HR: Značajke regenerativnog kočenja: Podesiva razina regeneracije; Automatska aktivacija; Integracija kočionog sustava; Jednostavno postavljanje; Ažuriranja softvera; Otporno na vremenske uvjete; Ostalo
da: Regenerative bremsefunktioner: Justerbart regenereringsniveau; Automatisk aktivering; Integration af bremsesystem; Nem at installere; Softwareopdateringer; Vejrbestandig; Andet
nl: Kenmerken regeneratief remmen: Instelbaar regeneratieniveau; Automatisch activeren; Integratie van remsysteem; Eenvoudig te installeren; Software-updates; Weersbestendig; Andere
hu: Regeneratív fékezés jellemzői: Állítható regenerációs szint; Automatikus aktiválás; Fékrendszer-integráció; Egyszerűen összeszerelhető; Szoftverfrissítések; Időjárásálló; Egyéb
tr: Rejeneratif Frenleme özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir rejenerasyon seviyesi; Otomatik etkinleştirme; Fren sistemi entegrasyonu; Kurulumu kolay; Yazılım güncellemeleri; Hava koşullarına dayanıklı; Diğer
el: Χαρακτηριστικά αναγεννητικής πέδησης: Ρυθμιζόμενο επίπεδο ανατροφοδότησης; Αυτόματη ενεργοποίηση; Ενοποίηση συστήματος πέδησης; Εύκολο στην τοποθέτηση; Ενημερώσεις λογισμικού; Ανθεκτικό στις καιρικές συνθήκες; Άλλο
en: Regenerative braking features: Adjustable regeneration level; Automatic activation; Brake system integration; Easy to install; Software updates; Weather resistant; Other
cs: Vlastnosti rekuperačního brzdění: Nastavitelná úroveň regenerace; Automatická aktivace; Integrace brzdového systému; Snadná instalace; Aktualizace softwaru; Odolnost vůči počasí; Jiné
th: คุณลักษณะของระบบเบรกสร้างพลังงานคืน: ปรับระดับการชาร์จไฟได้; การเปิดใช้งานแบบอัตโนมัติ; การผสานการทำงานระบบเบรก; ติดตั้งไม่ยาก; การอัปเดตซอฟต์แวร์; ทนต่อสภาพอากาศ; อื่นๆ
vi: Tính năng phanh tái sinh: Có thể điều chỉnh mức độ tái sinh; Tự động kích hoạt; Tích hợp hệ thống phanh; Dễ lắp đặt; Cập nhật phần mềm; Chịu được thời tiết; Khác
nb: Regenerative bremsefunksjoner: Regulerbar regenereringsnivå; Automatisk aktivering; Bremsesystemintegrasjon; Enkel å installere; Programvareoppdateringer; Værbestandig; Annet
de: Regenerative Bremsfunktionen: Einstellbare Regenerationsstufe; Automatische Aktivierung; Bremssystemintegration; Einfache Installation; Software-Updates; Wetterresistent; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Функции за регенеративно спиране: Регулируемо ниво на регенерация; Автоматично активиране; Интеграция на спирачната система; Лесно за монтаж; Актуализации на софтуера; Устойчиво на атмосферни влияния; Други
it: Funzionalità di frenata rigenerativa: Livello di rigenerazione variabile; Attivazione automatica; Integrazione del sistema frenante; Facile da installare; Aggiornamenti software; Resistente agli agenti atmosferici; Altro
fi: Regeneratiivisen jarrutuksen ominaisuudet: Säädettävä regeneraatiotaso; Automaattinen aktivointi; Jarrujärjestelmän integrointi; Helppo asentaa; Ohjelmistopäivitys; Säänkestävä; Muu
pt-BR: Recursos de frenagem regenerativa: Nível de regeneração ajustável; Ativação automática; Integração do sistema de frenagem; Fácil de instalar; Atualizações de software; Resistente ao clima; Outro
zh-CN: 再生制动功能: 可调再生水平; 自动激活; 制动系统集成; 易于安装; 软件更新; 耐气候; 其他
fr: Fonctionnalités de freinage régénératif: Niveau de régénération réglable; Activation automatique; Intégration du système de freinage; Facile à installer; Mises à jour de logiciel; Résistant aux intempéries; Autre
ru: Характеристики рекуперативного торможения: Регулируемый уровень регенерации; Автоматическая активация; Интеграция тормозной системы; Простая установка; Обновления программного обеспечения; Погодостойкий; Другое
es: Características del freno regenerativo: Nivel de regeneración regulable; Activación automática; Integración del sistema de frenos; Fácil de instalar; Actualizaciones de software; Resistente a la intemperie; Otros
ja: 回生ブレーキ機能: 再生レベル調整可能; 自動アクティベーション; ブレーキ装置一体化; 取り付けやすい; ソフトウェアアップデート; 耐候性; その他
sv: Detaljer för regenerativ broms: Justerbar regenereringsnivå; Automatisk aktivering; Integration av bromssystem; Lätt att installera; Programuppdatering; Vattentålig; Övrigt